zh-TW: 活動類型: 喜劇表演; 演唱會; 展覽; 節慶; 音樂劇; 研討會; 運動賽事; 劇院; 其他
fi: Tapahtumatyyppi: Komediashow; Konsertti; Näyttely; Festivaali; Musiikillinen; Seminaari; Urheilupeli; Teatteri; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta dogodka: Komična oddaja; Koncert; Razstava; Festival; Glasba; Seminar; Športna igra; Gledališče; Drugo
hu: Esemény típusa: Szórakoztató műsor; Koncert; Kiállítás; Fesztivál; Zenei; Szeminárium; Sport; Színház; Egyéb
vi: Loại sự kiện: Chương trình diễn hài; Buổi biểu diễn âm nhạc; Triển lãm; Lễ hội; Nhạc; Hội thảo; Thi đấu thể thao; Nhà hát; Khác
fr: Type d’événement: Spectacle d'humour; Concert; Exposition; Festival; Comédie musicale; Séminaire; Jeu sportif; Théâtre; Autre
de: Ereignistyp: Comedy-Show; Konzert; Ausstellung; Festival; Musical; Seminar; Sportveranstaltung; Theater; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Tip eveniment: Spectacol de comedie; Concert; Expoziție; Festival; Muzical; Seminar; Joc sportiv; Teatru; Altele
lt-LT: Renginio tipas: Komikų šou; Koncertas; Paroda; Festivalis; Miuziklas; Seminaras; Sporto rungtynės; Teatras; Kita
da: Begivenhedstype: Comedy; Koncert; Udstilling; Festival; Musical; Seminar; Sportskamp; Teater; Andet
bg-BG: Тип събитие: Комедийно шоу; Концерт; Изложба; Фестивал; Мюзикъл; Семинар; Спортна игра; Театър; Други
nl: Evenementtype: Comedy; Concert; Tentoonstelling; Festival; Musical; Seminar; Sportwedstrijd; Theater; Andere
zh-CN: 活动类型: 喜剧表演; 音乐会; 展览; 节庆; 音乐相关; 研讨会; 体育游戏; 剧院; 其他
pl: Typ zdarzenia: Program komediowy; Koncert; Wystawa; Festiwal; Musical; Seminarium; Gra sportowa; Teatr; Pozostałe
es: Tipo de evento: Show de comedia; Concierto; Exhibición; Festival; Musical; Seminario; Juego deportivo; Teatro; Otros
ko: 이벤트 유형: 코미디 쇼; 콘서트; 전시회; 축제; 뮤지컬; 세미나; 스포츠 게임; 극장; 기타
pt-BR: Tipo de evento: Espetáculo de comédia; Concerto; Exposição; Festival; Musical; Seminário; Jogo esportivo; Teatro; Outro
en: Event type: Comedy show; Concert; Exhibition; Festival; Musical; Seminar; Sport game; Theater; Other
tr: Etkinlik Tipi: Komedi şovu; Konser; Sergi; Festival; Müzikal; Seminer; Spor maçı; Tiyatro; Diğer
ru: Тип мероприятия: Комедийное шоу; Концерт; Выставка; Фестиваль; Мюзикл; Семинар; Спортивная игра; Театр; Другой
cs: Typ akce: Komediální show; Koncert; Výstava; Festival; Hudební; Seminář; Sportovní hra; Divadlo; Jiné
ja: イベントタイプ: お笑いショー; コンサート; 展示会; フェスティバル; ミュージカル; セミナー; スポーツ観戦; 劇場; その他
sv: Typ av evenemang: Komedishow; Konsert; Utställning; Festival; Musikal; Seminarium; Sportspel; Teater; Annat
pt-PT: Tipo de evento: Espetáculo de comédia; Concerto; Exposição; Festival; Musical; Seminário; Jogo desportivo; Teatro; Outro
it: Tipo di evento: Commedia; Concerto; Mostra; Festival; Musical; Seminario; Evento sportivo; Teatro; Altro
hr-HR: Vrsta događaja: Humoristična izvedba; Koncert; Izložba; Festival; Mjuzikl; Seminar; Sportska igra; Kazalište; Ostalo
el: Τύπος εκδήλωσης: Κωμική παράσταση; Συναυλία; Έκθεση; Φεστιβάλ; Μουσικό; Σεμινάριο; Αθλητικός αγώνας; Θέατρο; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ udalosti: Komediálne predstavenie; Koncert; Výstava; Festival; Hudobný; Seminár; Športová hra; Divadlo; Iné
nb: Hendelsestype: Komedie-show; Konsert; Utstilling; Festival; Musikal; Seminar; Sportsspill; Teater; Annen
th: ประเภทเหตุการณ์: รายการตลก; คอนเสิร์ต; นิทรรศการ; งานเทศกาล; มิวสิคัล; สัมมนา; การแข่งขันกีฬา; โรงละคร; อื่นๆ